Vermont statutes. TITLE 16A Education Charters and Agreements
Chapter 21. Vergennes Incorporated School District

§ 21-1.
Incorporation of district.

The City of Vergennes as the city is bounded, is hereby incorporated as a graded school district by the name of Vergennes Graded School District and shall have all the powers, duties, and privileges granted by law to graded school districts.